Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
3. CIVIL PROVISIONS OF GENERAL APPLICATION

Note

Article heading reenacted by L 2015, c 77, pt of §1.

§576B-301 Proceedings under this chapter.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this article applies to all
proceedings under this chapter.

(b) An individual petitioner or a support
enforcement agency may initiate a proceeding authorized under this chapter by
filing a petition in an initiating tribunal for forwarding to a responding
tribunal or by filing a petition or a comparable pleading directly in a
tribunal of another state or a foreign country which has or can obtain personal
jurisdiction over the respondent. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next